Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-526
Class I, II, III,
IV, or VI school district; school board; schools; supervision and control; powers.

(1) The
school board or board of education of a Class I, II, III, IV, or VI school
district has responsibility for the general care and upkeep of the schools,
shall provide the necessary supplies and equipment, and, except as otherwise
provided, has the power to cause pupils to be taught in such branches and
classified in such grades or departments as may seem best adapted to a course
of study which the board shall establish with the consent and advice of the
State Department of Education. The board shall make provision for pupils that
may enter at any time during the school year. The board shall have a record
kept of the advancement of all pupils in each branch of study. The board shall
make rules and regulations as it deems necessary for the government and health
of the pupils and devise any means as may seem best to secure the regular
attendance and progress of children at school.

(2) The school
board may make expenditures for supplies, equipment, travel, meals, and lodging
for school programs and activities, including extracurricular and interscholastic
activities, appropriate for the benefit, government, and health of pupils
enrolled in the school district.

Laws 1881, c. 78, subdivision V, § 3, p. 352;

Laws 1883, c. 72, § 10, p. 293;

Laws 1901, c. 61, § 1, p. 433;

R.S.1913, § 6783;

Laws 1919, c. 151, § 1, p. 339;

C.S.1922, § 6324;

C.S.1929, § 79-503;

R.S.1943, § 79-503;

Laws 1945, c. 202, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 82, p. 719;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-443;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 279;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB967, § 5.

For powers of health district in counties over 200,000 population, see section 71-1623.

This section (formerly section 79-443) gives a school district the power to provide necessary appendages to the schoolhouse and to secure the regular attendance of students at school; necessarily implied in this section is the power to construct an access road when the only party in a position to build the road in the necessary timeframe is the school district. Robertson v. School Dist. No. 17 of Douglas County, 252 Neb. 103, 560 N.W.2d 469 (1997).

In devising such means as may seem best to secure the regular attendance and progress of children at school, a school board may choose to provide bus transportation. School Dist. of Waterloo v. Hutchinson, 244 Neb. 665, 508 N.W.2d 832 (1993).

This section imposes no duty on school boards to provide actual bus service to students. Warren v. Papillion School Dist. No. 27, 199 Neb. 410, 259 N.W.2d 281 (1977).

Board of education had power to provide for busing, but duty to do so was not imposed and mandamus not warranted. Connot v. Monroe, 193 Neb. 453, 227 N.W.2d 827 (1975).

This section confers power on school boards to establish such branches and grades as the board shall deem best adapted to the school. State ex rel. Shineman v. Board of Education, 152 Neb. 644, 42 N.W.2d 168 (1950).

Under former statute, there was no statutory provision authorizing the establishment of a high school in a district organized under article 3. Griggs v. School District No. 76 of Wayne County, 152 Neb. 282, 40 N.W.2d 859 (1950).

Right of parent to make reasonable selection from prescribed course of studies which shall be carried by his child in public schools is not limited to any particular school, nor any particular grade. State ex rel. Kelley v. Ferguson, 95 Neb. 63, 144 N.W. 1039 (1914).

Two systems of school administration exist, one vesting control in electors at school meeting and one making board of education the governing body. Gaddis v. School Dist. of City of Lincoln, 92 Neb. 701, 139 N.W. 280 (1912).

The matter of hiring a teacher for a school is committed to the judgment and discretion of the district board. State ex rel. Lewellen v. Smith, 49 Neb. 755, 69 N.W. 114 (1896).